Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2602
Commission; purpose.

The purpose of the commission is to join representatives of African Americans and Black Americans across the diaspora in Nebraska to enhance the well-being of African Americans and to develop proactive solutions.

Laws 2020, LB918, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB69, § 2.